Illinois, session 104th, SB2331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Livestock Management Facilities Act is 5amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 77/35)7    Sec. 35. Setbacks for livestock management and livestock 8handling facilities.9    (a) Grandfather provision; facilities in existence prior 10to July 15, 1991. Livestock management facilities and 11livestock waste handling facilities in existence prior to July 1215, 1991 shall comply with setbacks in existence prior to July 1315, 1991, as set forth in the Illinois Environmental 14Protection Act and rules promulgated under that Act.15    (b) Grandfather provision; facilities in existence on May 1621, 1996 (the effective date of the Act) and after July 15, 171991. Livestock management facilities and livestock waste 18handling facilities in existence on the effective date of this 19Act but after July 15, 1991 shall comply with setbacks in 20existence prior to the effective date of this Act, as set forth 21in the Illinois Environmental Protection Act and rules 22promulgated under that Act.23    (c) Grandfather provision; new facilities the construction   SB2331- 2 -LRB104 03182 BDA 13203 b1or expansion of which commenced before the effective date of 2this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. New 3livestock management or livestock waste handling facilities. 4Any new facility the construction or expansion of which 5commenced before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 6the 104th General Assembly shall comply with the following 7setbacks: 8        (1) For purposes of determining setback distances, 9    minimum distances shall be measured from the nearest 10    corner of the residence or place of common assembly to the 11    nearest corner of the earthen waste lagoon or livestock 12    management facility, whichever is closer. 13        (2) A livestock management facility or livestock waste 14    handling facility serving less than 50 animal units shall 15    be exempt from setback distances as set forth in this Act 16    but shall be subject to rules promulgated under the 17    Illinois Environmental Protection Act. 18        (3) For a livestock management facility or waste 19    handling facility serving 50 or greater but less than 20    1,000 animal units, the minimum setback distance shall be 21    1/4 mile from the nearest occupied residence and 1/2 mile 22    from the nearest populated area. 23        (4) For a livestock management facility or livestock 24    waste handling facility serving 1,000 or greater but less 25    than 7,000 animal units, the setback is as follows: 26            (A) For a populated area, the minimum setback   SB2331- 3 -LRB104 03182 BDA 13203 b1        shall be increased 440 feet over the minimum setback 2        of 1/2 mile for each additional 1,000 animal units 3        over 1,000 animal units. 4            (B) For any occupied residence, the minimum 5        setback shall be increased 220 feet over the minimum 6        setback of 1/4 mile for each additional 1,000 animal 7        units over 1,000 animal units. 8        (5) For a livestock management facility or livestock 9    waste handling facility serving 7,000 or greater animal 10    units, the setback is as follows: 11            (A) For a populated area, the minimum setback 12        shall be 1 mile. 13            (B) For any occupied residence, the minimum 14        setback shall be 1/2 mile.15    (c-5) New facilities the construction or expansion of 16which commences on or after the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. New facilities 18the construction or expansion of which commences on or after 19the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 20Assembly shall comply with the following setbacks:21        (1) For purposes of determining setback distances, 22    minimum distances shall be measured from the nearest 23    corner of the residence or place of common assembly to the 24    nearest corner of the earthen waste lagoon or livestock 25    management facility, whichever is closer.26        (2) A livestock management facility or livestock waste   SB2331- 4 -LRB104 03182 BDA 13203 b1    handling facility serving less than 50 animal units shall 2    be exempt from setback distances as set forth in this Act 3    but shall be subject to rules adopted under the Illinois 4    Environmental Protection Act.5        (3) For a livestock management facility or waste 6    handling facility serving 50 or greater animal units, the 7    minimum setback distance shall be 2 miles from the nearest 8    occupied residence and 2 miles from the nearest populated 9    area. 10    (d) Requirements governing the location of a new livestock 11management facility and new livestock waste-handling facility 12and conditions for exemptions or compliance with the maximum 13feasible location as provided in rules adopted pursuant to the 14Illinois Environmental Protection Act concerning agriculture 15regulated pollution shall apply to those facilities identified 16in subsections (b), and (c), and (c-5) of this Section. With 17regard to the maximum feasible location requirements, any 18reference to a setback distance in the rules under the 19Illinois Environmental Protection Act shall mean the 20appropriate distance as set forth in this Section.21    (e) Setback category shall be determined by the design 22capacity in animal units of the livestock management facility.23    (f) Setbacks may be decreased when innovative designs as 24approved by the Department are incorporated into the facility.25    (g) A setback may be decreased when waivers are obtained 26from owners of residences that are occupied and located in the   SB2331- 5 -LRB104 03182 BDA 13203 b1setback area.2(Source: P.A. 91-110, eff. 7-13-99.)